Arkansas, session 2025, SB428.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-118-109(f)(1), regarding the statute of
limitation for a civil cause of action for victims of human trafficking, is
amended to read as follows:
(f)(1) A statute of limitation period imposed for the filing of a
civil action under this section will not begin to run until A civil action
under this section shall be commenced within ten (10) years from the date the
plaintiff discovers that the human trafficking incident occurred and that the
defendant caused, was responsible for, or benefitted financially or received
anything of value from the human trafficking incident.




*CEB112*
03/11/2025 1:17:55 PM CEB112